Idaho, session 2026, H0907.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Career Technical Education
for the Secondary and General Programs program $1,877,300 from the Idaho
Career Ready Students Program Fund to be expended for trustee and benefit
payments for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 261, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Idaho Division of Career Technical Education for
the Secondary and General Programs program $957,600 from the Idaho Career
Ready Students Program Fund to be expended for trustee and benefit payments
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 2 of this act shall be in full force and effect
on and after passage and approval, and Section 1 of this act shall be in full
force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.